District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.15

Nonparentage as defense.

A party whose parentage of a child has been previously determined by or pursuant to law may not plead nonparentage as a defense to a proceeding under this chapter.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 315, 63 DCR 222

History